Louisiana, session 2026, HB836.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:330.1(B)(2)(a)(introductory paragraph) and (b) and (C)(1)(a)(i)
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§330.1. Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-East and Southeast
Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-West Bank; territorial jurisdiction;
board of commissioners; appointments; terms; compensation; vacancy;
officers; meetings; domicile
* * *
B. Each flood protection authority, through its board of commissioners as
provided for in this Section, shall exercise all authority over and have management,
oversight, and control of the following territories as provided by law for the boards
of commissioners of such levee districts to which the authority is a successor and to
the extent provided for in this Part:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1179 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 836
(2)(a) The following levee districts and parts of levee districts and parishes
shall be included within the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-West
Bank and shall work together to safeguard the public against flooding, storm surge,
and other potential flood-related issues:
* * *
(b) These lands and all property thereon situated, not exempt from taxation,
shall be subject to the provisions of this Chapter. However, nothing in this Section
shall be construed to impair any existing rights, contracts, or obligations of these
districts or parishes.
C.(1)
* * *
(a) The board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Authority-East shall be composed of nine members, one member from St. Bernard
Parish, two members from Jefferson Parish, three members from Orleans Parish who
shall reside within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority, and three members who
do not reside within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority. The members shall
be appointed by the governor from nominations submitted by the nominating
committee as follows:
(i) Four members who shall either be an engineer or a professional in a
related field such as geotechnical, hydraulic and hydrological, or environmental
science. Of the four members, one member shall be a civil engineer.
* * *